Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1418.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 28-1418 to 28-1429.07:

(1) Alternative nicotine product means any noncombustible product containing nicotine or a nicotine analogue that is intended for human consumption, whether chewed, absorbed, dissolved, or ingested by any other means. Alternative nicotine product does not include any electronic nicotine delivery system, cigarette, cigar, or other tobacco product, or any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

(2) Cigarette means any product that contains nicotine, is intended to be burned or heated under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of or contains (a) any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not containing tobacco, (b) tobacco, in any form, that is functional in the product which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette, or (c) any roll of tobacco wrapped in any substance containing tobacco which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section;

(3) Delivery sale means to sell, give, or furnish products (a) by mail or delivery service, (b) through the Internet or a computer network, (c) by telephone, or (d) through any other electronic method;

(4)(a) Electronic nicotine delivery system means any product or device containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives that employs a heating element, power source, electronic circuit, or other electronic, chemical, or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size, to simulate smoking by delivering the nicotine, nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives in vapor, fog, mist, gas, or aerosol form to a person inhaling from the product or device.

(b) Electronic nicotine delivery system includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) Any substance containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives, whether sold separately or sold in combination with a product or device that is intended to deliver to a person nicotine, nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives in vapor, fog, mist, gas, or aerosol form;

(ii) Any product or device marketed, manufactured, distributed, or sold as an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, electronic hookah, or similar products, names, descriptors, or devices; and

(iii) Any component, part, or accessory of such a product or device that is used during operation of the product or device when sold in combination with any substance containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives.

(c) Electronic nicotine delivery system does not include the following:

(i) An alternative nicotine product, cigarette, cigar, or other tobacco product, or any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or

(ii) Any component, part, or accessory of such a product or device that is used during operation of the product or device when not sold in combination with any substance containing nicotine, a nicotine analogue, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives;

(5) Nicotine analogue means a substance that has:

(a) A chemical structure substantially similar to nicotine; or

(b) An effect on the central nervous system that is substantially similar to, or greater than, the effect on the central nervous system of nicotine;

(6) Self-service display means a retail display that contains a tobacco product, a tobacco-derived product, an electronic nicotine delivery system, or an alternative nicotine product and is located in an area openly accessible to a retailer's customers and from which such customers can readily access the product without the assistance of a salesperson. Self-service display does not include a display case that holds tobacco products, tobacco-derived products, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative nicotine products behind locked doors; and

(7) Tobacco specialty store means a retail store that (a) derives at least seventy-five percent of its revenue from tobacco products, tobacco-derived products, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative nicotine products and (b) does not permit persons under the age of twenty-one years to enter the premises unless accompanied by a parent or legal guardian.

Laws 2014, LB863, § 17;

Laws 2019, LB149, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB1064, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB9, § 1.